Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COOK COUNTY SCHOOLS; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects at Independent School District No. 166, Cook County, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under applicable statutes if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after May 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2028: new text end new text begin (1) a new secure main entrance, school office area, auxiliary gym, fitness center, activities entrance, and additional locker rooms; new text end new text begin (2) renovations and updates to the main commons area, cafeteria, bathrooms, locker rooms, classrooms, hallways, windows and doors, sidewalks, asphalt, and the outdoor playground area; and new text end new text begin (3) updates to HVAC, lighting, security, and PA systems. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after May 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2028. new text end